District of Columbia statutes.
48-904.07

Enlistment of minors to distribute.

(a)

Any person who is 21 years of age or over and who enlists, hires, contracts, or encourages any person under 18 years of age to sell or distribute any controlled substance, in violation of § 48-904.01(a), for the profit or benefit of such person who enlists, hires, contracts, or encourages this criminal activity shall be punished for sale or distribution in the same manner as if that person directly sold or distributed the controlled substance.

(b)

Anyone found guilty of subsection (a) of this section shall be subject to the following additional penalties:

(1)

Upon a first conviction the party may be imprisoned for not more than 10 years, fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or both;

(2)

Upon a second or subsequent conviction, the party may be imprisoned for not more than 20 years, fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or both.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 407, 28 DCR 3081
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 252(d), 60 DCR 2064

History

1981 Ed., § 33-547.

Prior Codifications

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $10,000” in (b)(1), and for “not more than $20,000” in (b)(2).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 252(d) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Emergency Legislation

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.

Editor's Notes